\ copyright © 2006, 2017 the osmosian order (4700)

Etapas necessárias para que se adicione um button to the dialog usando um string:
Se the string estiver blank, void the button; exit.
Se the dialog for inexistente, cancele.
Create the button.
Append the button to the dialog's buttons.
Put the string into the button's name.

Etapas necessárias para que se adicione um color e um handler to um menu:
Se the menu for inexistente, cancele.
Create um command.
Append the command to the menu's commands.
Put the swatch width into the command's width.
Put the handler into the command's handler.
Put the color into the command's color.

Etapas necessárias para que se adicione um name e um handler to um menu:
Se the menu for inexistente, cancele.
Create um command.
Append the command to the menu's commands.
Put the command height into the command's width.
Put the name into the command's name.
Put the handler into the command's handler.
Put the white color into the command's color.
Put "esquerda" into the command's alignment.

Etapas necessárias para que se adicione um name e um handler to um submenu:
Adicione the name e "" e the handler to the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se adicione um name e um shortcut e um handler to um submenu:
Se the submenu for inexistente, cancele.
Create um command.
Append the command to the submenu's commands.
Put the submenu width into the command's width.
Put the name into the command's name.
Put the shortcut into the command's shortcut.
Put the handler into the command's handler.
Put the white color into the command's color.
Put "esquerda" into the command's alignment.

Etapas necessárias para que se adicione swatches to um submenu usando um handler:
Se the submenu for inexistente, cancele.
Adicione the clear color e the handler to the submenu.
Put the palette width dividido por 3 into the submenu's commands' last's width.
Put "limpar" into the submenu's commands' last's name.
Put "centro" into the submenu's commands' last's alignment.
Adicione the white color e the handler to the submenu.
Put the palette width dividido por 3 into the submenu's commands' last's width.
Adicione the black color e the handler to the submenu.
Put the palette width dividido por 3 into the submenu's commands' last's width.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the gray color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the red color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the orange color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the yellow color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the lime color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the green color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the teal color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the cyan color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the sky color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the blue color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the purple color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the magenta color.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando the handler e the violet color.

Etapas necessárias para que se adicione swatches to um submenu usando um handler e um color:
Se the submenu for inexistente, cancele.
Privatize the color.
Put 875 into the color's lightness.
Loop.
Adicione the color e the handler to the submenu.
Subtract 125 from the color's lightness.
Se the color's lightness é less than 125, cancele.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se adjust the dialog:
Se the dialog for inexistente, cancele.
Adjust the dialog (buttons).
Adjust the dialog (roundy box).
Adjust the dialog (prompt).
Adjust the dialog (text).

Etapas necessárias para que se adjust the dialog (buttons):
Put the bar's display e 1/12 inch into um roundy box.
Put the roundy box's right minus the button width into the roundy box's left.
Loop.
Get um button from the dialog's buttons (backwards).
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Put the roundy box into the button's roundy box.
Move the roundy box left the button width.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se adjust the dialog (prompt):
Put the dialog's roundy box's left plus 1/8 inch into the dialog's prompt box's left.
Put the dialog's roundy box's top plus 1/24 inch into the dialog's prompt box's top.
Get um width usando the dialog's prompt e the default font.
Put the dialog's prompt box's left plus the width plus 1/12 inch into the dialog's prompt box's right.
Put the dialog's roundy box's bottom minus 1/24 inch into the dialog's prompt box's bottom.

Etapas necessárias para que se adjust the dialog (roundy box):
Put the bar's display e 1/12 inch into the dialog's roundy box.
Se the dialog's buttons are empty, cancele.
Put the dialog's first button's left into the dialog's roundy box's right.

Etapas necessárias para que se adjust the dialog (text):
Se the dialog's text for inexistente, cancele.
Abra the dialog's text's horizontal scroll flag.
Select every pedaço in the dialog's text.
Put the dialog's pen into the dialog's text's pen.
Put the dialog's prompt box's right into um box's left.
Put the dialog's prompt box's top into the box's top.
Put the dialog's roundy box's right minus 1/8 inch into the box's right.
Put the dialog's prompt box's bottom into the box's bottom.
Change the dialog's text usando the box.

Etapas necessárias para que se adjust um menu usando um spot e um width:
Se the menu for inexistente, cancele.
Privatize the spot.
Put the spot's x-coord plus the width into um right coord.
Loop.
Get um command from the menu's commands.
Se the command for inexistente, pare.
Se the spot's x-coord plus the command's width é greater than the right, put the original spot's x-coord into the spot's x-coord; adicione the command height to the spot's y-coord.
Put the spot e the spot into the command's roundy box.
Adicione the command's width e the command height to the command's roundy box's right-bottom.
Adicione the command's width to the spot's x-coord.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se adjust some tabs:
Se the tabs' count for 0, cancele.
Put the switch's box's width dividido por the tabs' count into um width.
Round the width to the tpp.
Loop.
Get um tab from the tabs.
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Put the switch's box into the tab's box.
Adicione 1/4 inch to the tab's top.
Se the tab for not the tabs' first, put the tab's previous' right into the tab's left.
Se the tab for not the tabs' last, put the tab's left plus the width into the tab's right.
Repeat.

An alternative é um string.

The answer é um string.

Etapas necessárias para que se ask um question:
Ask the question with "".

Etapas necessárias para que se ask um question with choices um string e another string:
Ask the question with choices the string e the other string e "".

Etapas necessárias para que se ask um question with choices um string e another string e um third string:
Create the dialog.
Put "choice" into the dialog's kind.
Put the question into the dialog's prompt.
Adicione um button to the dialog usando the string.
Adicione another button to the dialog usando the other string.
Adicione um third button to the dialog usando the third string.
Handle the dialog.
Destroy the dialog.

Etapas necessárias para que se ask um question with um default número:
Convert the default to um string.
Ask the question with the string.

Etapas necessárias para que se ask um question with um default ratio:
Convert the default to um string.
Ask the question with the string.

Etapas necessárias para que se ask um question with um default string:
Create the dialog.
Put "input" into the dialog's kind.
Put the question into the dialog's prompt.
Adicione um button to the dialog usando "Beleza".
Adicione another button to the dialog usando "Cancelar".
Create the dialog's text.
Put the default into the dialog's text.
Handle the dialog.
Destroy the dialog.

The bar has um height, um box, um display box e um mode.

An button é um coisa with um roundy box e um name.

The button width é 1 inch. \ was 2/3

Etapas necessárias para que se cancel the dialog:
Se the dialog for inexistente, cancele.
Se the dialog's text for inexistente, put "cancelar" into the answer.
Se the dialog's text for not inexistente, put "" into the answer.
Relinquish control.

The command height é um height equal to 1/3 inch.

An command é um coisa with
an roundy box,
an width,
an color, um font, um alignment,
an name, um shortcut, e um handler.

Etapas necessárias para que se create um button:
Allocate memory por the button.

Etapas necessárias para que se create um command:
Allocate memory por the command.
Put the clear color into the command's color.
Put the default font into the command's font.
Put 1/12 inch into the command's roundy box's radius.
Put "esquerda" into the command's alignment.

Etapas necessárias para que se create the dialog:
Allocate memory por the dialog.
Put the black color into the dialog's pen.

Etapas necessárias para que se create um menu:
Allocate memory por the menu.
Put the big-a pedaço into um pedaço.
Loop.
Se the pedaço é greater than the big-z pedaço, pare.
Put the pedaço into um string.
Adicione the string e the string to the menu.
Put "center" into the menu's commands' last's  alignment.
Adicione 1 to the pedaço.
Repeat.
Adicione "*" e "*" to the menu. \ special menu
Put "center" into the menu's commands' last's  alignment. \ special menu
Put the bar's display's left-top into um spot. \ special menu
\  adjust the menu usando the spot e 26 times the swatch width. \ no special menu
Adjust the menu usando the spot e 27 times the swatch width. \ special menu

Etapas necessárias para que se create um submenu:
Allocate memory por the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se create um tab:
Allocate memory por the tab.

The current menu é um menu.

The current process é um process.

The current tab é um tab.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um event é ctrl-tab:
Se the event for inexistente, say no.
Se the event's kind for not "key down", say no.
Se the event's key for not the tab key, say no.
Se the event's ctrl flag estiver not verde, say no.
Say yes.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um node should be read-only:
Se the node for inexistente, say  no.
Se the node's kind for not "file", say no.
Loop.
Get um tab from the tabs.
Se the tab for inexistente, say no.
Se the tab's node for inexistente, repeat.
Se the tab's node é the node, repeat.
Se the tab's node's kind for not "file", repeat.
Se the tab's node's path é the node's path, say yes.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um spot estiver in the bar:
Se the spot estiver in the bar's box, say yes.
Say no.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um spot estiver in um button:
Se the button for inexistente, say no.
Se the spot estiver in the button's roundy box, say yes.
Say no.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um spot estiver in um command:
Se the command for inexistente, say no.
Se the spot estiver in the command's roundy box, say yes.
Say no.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um spot estiver in um menu:
Se the menu for inexistente, say no.
Find um command usando the menu e the spot.
Se the command for inexistente, say no.
Say yes.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um spot estiver in the pad:
Se the spot estiver in the pad's box, say yes.
Say no.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um spot estiver in the status:
Se the bar's mode for not "normal", say no.
Se the spot estiver in the status' roundy box, say yes.
Say no.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um spot estiver in the switch:
Find um tab usando the spot.
Se the tab for inexistente, say no.
Say yes.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um spot estiver in um tab:
Se the tab for inexistente, say no.
Se the spot estiver in the tab's box, say yes.
Say no.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se um tab é free:
Se the tab for inexistente, say no.
Se the tab's node for inexistente, say no.
Se the tab's node's kind for not "root", say no.
Say yes.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se the user é sure:
Ask "Tem certeza?" with choices "Sim" e "Não".
Se the answer for "Sim", say yes.
Say no.

Etapas necessárias para que se determine se the user é willing to close um node:
Se the node for inexistente, say yes.
Se the node for not modified, say yes.
Ask "Salvar?" with choices "Sim" e "Não" e "Cancelar".
Se the answer for "cancelar", say no.
Se the answer for "não", say yes.
Save the node.
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, show error the i/o error; say no.
Say yes.

The desktop color é um color.

Etapas necessárias para que se destroy um tab:
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Destroy the tab's node's root node.
Deallocate the tab.

The dialog é um coisa with
an kind [choice, error, input],
an roundy box,
an prompt box, um prompt,
an pen color,
an text,
some buttons.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw the bar:
Unmask everything.
Draw the bar's box with the black color e the black color.
Draw the bar's box with the desktop color e the desktop color e 1/8 inch (rounding the top).
Se the bar's mode for "dialog", draw the dialog; exit.
Draw the menu.
Draw the status.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw um box with um border color e um fill color e um radius (rounding the bottom):
Put the box e the radius into um roundy box.
Draw the roundy box with the border e the fill.
Privatize the box.
Put the box's height dividido por 2 into um height.
Put the box's top plus the height into the box's bottom.
Draw the box with the border e the clear color.
Adicione the tpp to the box's bottom.
Draw the box with the clear color e the fill.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw um box with um border color e um fill color e um radius (rounding the top):
Put the box e the radius into um roundy box.
Draw the roundy box with the border e the fill.
Privatize the box.
Put the box's height dividido por 2 into um height.
Put the box's bottom minus the height into the box's top.
Draw the box with the border e the clear color.
Subtract the tpp from the box's top.
Draw the box with the clear color e the fill.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw um button:
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Unmask everything.
Draw the button's roundy box with the black color e the white color.
Mask outside the button's roundy box.
Draw the button's name in the button's roundy box with the black color e the default font e "center".

Etapas necessárias para que se draw some buttons:
Get um button from the buttons.
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Draw the button.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw um command:
Se the command for inexistente, cancele.
Unmask everything.
Put the command's color into um color.
Se the color é clear, put the white color into the color.
Draw the command's roundy box with the black color e the color.
Put the command's roundy box into um box.
Adjust the box usando 1/8 inch e 0 e -1/8 inch e 0.
Mask outside the command's roundy box. \ don't mask to the box, menu letters are too big to fit
Draw the command's name in the box with the black color e the command's font e the command's alignment.
Draw the command's shortcut at the right of the box with the black color e the command's font.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw some commands:
Get um command from the commands.
Se the command for inexistente, cancele.
Draw the command.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw the desktop:
Draw the bar.
Draw the switch.
Draw the pad.
Draw the current menu.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw the dialog:
Se the dialog for inexistente, cancele.
Unmask everything.
Draw the dialog's roundy box with the black color e the white color.
Mask outside the dialog's roundy box.
Draw the dialog's prompt in the dialog's prompt box with the dialog's pen e the default font e "left".
Draw the dialog's text (editing).
Draw the dialog's buttons.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw um menu:
Se the menu for inexistente, cancele.
Draw the menu's commands.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw the pad:
Mask only outside the pad's box.
Draw the pad's box with the desktop color e the desktop color.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", draw the current tab's node; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", draw the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", draw the current tab's node's document; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", draw the current tab's node's page; exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw the status:
Unmask everything.
Draw the status' roundy box with the desktop color e the desktop color.
Draw the status' roundy box with the black color e the white color.
Put the status' roundy box into um box.
Adjust the box usando 1/8 inch e 0 e -1/8 inch e 0.
Mask outside the box.
Draw the status' string in the box with the black color e the default font e "right".

Etapas necessárias para que se draw the switch:
Mask only outside the switch's box.
Draw the switch's box with the black color e the black color.
Put the switch's box into um box.
Subtract 1/3 inch from the box's bottom.
Draw the box with the desktop color e the desktop color.
Draw the tabs.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw um tab:
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Mask only outside the tab's box.
Draw the tab's box with the desktop color e the desktop color e 1/8 inch (rounding the bottom).
Se the tab's previous for not inexistente, draw the tab's box's left line with the black color.
Se the tab for not the current tab, draw the tab's box's top line with the black color.
Draw the tab's name in the center of the tab's box with the black color e the default font.

Etapas necessárias para que se draw some tabs:
Get um tab from the tabs.
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Draw the tab.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se fill some tabs:
Get um tab from the tabs.
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Put "localizador" into the tab's mode.
Create the tab's node.
Open the tab's node.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se finalize:
Destroy the tabs.
Finalize the compiler.
Finalize the writer.
Finalize the editor.
Finalize the localizador.
Finalize the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se finalize the bar:
Finalize the status.
Destroy the menu.

Etapas necessárias para que se finalize the desktop:
Finalize the switch.
Finalize the pad.
Finalize the bar.

Etapas necessárias para que se finalize the pad:

Etapas necessárias para que se finalize the status:

Etapas necessárias para que se finalize the switch:

Etapas necessárias para que se find um button usando um key:
Void the button.
Se the dialog for inexistente, cancele.
Loop.
Get the button from the dialog's buttons.
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Se the button's name estiver blank, repeat.
Put the button's name's first's target into um pedaço.
Uppercase the pedaço.
Se the pedaço é the key, cancele.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se find um button usando um spot:
Void the button.
Se the dialog for inexistente, cancele.
Loop.
Get the button from the dialog's buttons.
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Se the spot estiver in the button, cancele.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se find um command usando um menu e um spot:
Void the command.
Se the menu for inexistente, cancele.
Loop.
Get the command from the menu's commands.
Se the command for inexistente, cancele.
Se the spot estiver in the command, cancele.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se find um directory to compile:
Clear the directory.
Se the current tab's node for inexistente, cancele.
Se the current tab's node's source for inexistente, cancele.
Put the current tab's node's directory into the directory.

Etapas necessárias para que se find um free tab starting with um tab:
Privatize the tab.
Loop.
Se the tab for inexistente, pare.
Se the tab é free, pare.
Put the tab's next into the tab.
Repeat.
Put the tab into the free tab.

The find mode é um string [find, check spelling, check spelling - entire document, check spelling - current page only].

Etapas necessárias para que se find um tab usando um spot:
Void the tab.
Loop.
Get the tab from the tabs.
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Se the spot estiver in the tab, cancele.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se format um string to fit in um box usando um font:
Put the box's width minus 180 into um width.
Loop.
Se the string's length é less than 2, cancele.
Get another width usando the string e the memory canvas e the font.
Se the other width é less than the width, cancele.
Remove the last pedaço from the string.
Remove the last pedaço from the string.
Append "…" to the string.
Repeat.

An free tab é um tab.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle align usando um alignment:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle align usando the current tab's node's page e the alignment; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle border e fill usando um color: \ special menu
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle border e fill usando the current tab's node's page e the color; exit. \ special menu
Cluck. \ special menu

Etapas necessárias para que se handle border usando um color:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle border usando the current tab's node's page e the color; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle bring to front:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle bring to front usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle capitalize:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle capitalize usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle capitalize usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle check spelling:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle check spelling usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle check spelling (current page only):
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle check spelling usando the current tab's node's page (current page only); exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle check spelling (entire document):
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle check spelling usando the current tab's node's page (entire document); exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle close:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle close (writer); exit.
Handle close (other).

Etapas necessárias para que se handle close (other):
Se the current tab's node é root-level, cluck; deselect the nodettes in the current tab's node; show the desktop with status; exit.
Se the user for not willing to close the current tab's node, cancele.
Show status "Fechando...".
Close the current tab's node.
Switch the current tab to the current tab's node's parent node.
Show the desktop with status.
Refresh the cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle close (writer):
Handle close sem drawing (writer).
Show the desktop with status.
Refresh the cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle close all:
Show status "Fechando...".
Get um tab from the tabs (backwards).
Se the tab for inexistente, pare.
Switch to the tab.
Se the tab's node é modified, show the desktop.
Se the user for not willing to close the tab's node, pare.
Collapse the tab's node to root-level.
Deselect the nodettes in the tab's node.
Switch the tab to the tab's node.
Repeat.
Show the desktop with status.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle close sem drawing (writer):
Close the current tab's node's page.
Void the current tab's node's page.
Switch the current tab to the current tab's node.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command:
Se the command for inexistente, cancele.
\ offer it dispatchers
Se the command's handler for "a", handle the command (a); exit.
Se the command's handler for "alignment...", handle the command (alignment...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "b", handle the command (b); exit.
Se the command's handler for "border...", handle the command (border...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "c", handle the command (c); exit.
Se the command's handler for "check spelling...", handle the command (check spelling...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "color...", handle the command (color...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "d", handle the command (d); exit.
Se the command's handler for "e", handle the command (e); exit.
Se the command's handler for "f", handle the command (f); exit.
Se the command's handler for "fill...", handle the command (fill...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "fonte...", handle the command (fonte...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "font height...", handle the command (font height...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "g", handle the command (g); exit.
Se the command's handler for "grid...", handle the command (grid...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "h", handle the command (h); exit.
Se the command's handler for "i", handle the command (i); exit.
Se the command's handler for "j", handle the command (j); exit.
Se the command's handler for "k", handle the command (k); exit.
Se the command's handler for "l", handle the command (l); exit.
Se the command's handler for "label...", handle the command (label...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "m", handle the command (m); exit.
Se the command's handler for "n", handle the command (n); exit.
Se the command's handler for "o", handle the command (o); exit.
Se the command's handler for "p", handle the command (p); exit.
Se the command's handler for "pen...", handle the command (pen...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "q", handle the command (q); exit.
Se the command's handler for "r", handle the command (r); exit.
Se the command's handler for "s", handle the command (s); exit.
Se the command's handler for "sort...", handle the command (sort...); exit.
Se the command's handler for "t", handle the command (t); exit.
Se the command's handler for "u", handle the command (u); exit.
Se the command's handler for "v", handle the command (v); exit.
Se the command's handler for "w", handle the command (w); exit.
Se the command's handler for "x", handle the command (x); exit.
Se the command's handler for "y", handle the command (y); exit.
Se the command's handler for "z", handle the command (z); exit.
Se the command's handler for "*", handle the command (*); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "\", handle the command (\); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "/", handle the command (a); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F1", handle the command (F1); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F2", handle the command (F2); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F3", handle the command (F3); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F4", handle the command (F4); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F5", handle the command (F5); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F6", handle the command (F6); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F7", handle the command (F7); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F8", handle the command (F8); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F9", handle the command (F9); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F10", handle the command (F10); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F11", handle the command (F11); exit. \ special menu
\Se the command's handler for "F12", handle the command (F12); exit. \ special menu

\ does it dispatchers
Show the desktop.
Se the command's handler for "handle bring to front", handle bring to front; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle align usando center", handle align usando "center"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle align usando left", handle align usando "left"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle align usando right", handle align usando "right"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle border", handle border usando the command's color; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle border e fill", handle border e fill usando the command's color; exit. \ special menu
Se the command's handler for "handle fill", handle fill usando the command's color; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font height usando 1 inch", handle font height usando 1 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font height usando 1/2 inch", handle font height usando 1/2 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font height usando 1/3 inch", handle font height usando 1/3 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font height usando 1/4 inch", handle font height usando 1/4 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font height usando 1/5 inch", handle font height usando 1/5 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font height usando 1/6 inch", handle font height usando 1/6 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font height usando 1/8 inch", handle font height usando 1/8 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font height other", handle font height other; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle font name", handle font name; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle radius", handle radius; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle pen", handle pen usando the command's color; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle capitalize", handle capitalize; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle check spelling", handle check spelling; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle check spelling (entire document)", handle check spelling (entire document); exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle check spelling (current page only)", handle check spelling (current page only); exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle close", handle close; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle close all", handle close all; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle comment", handle comment; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle compile", handle compile; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle copy", handle copy; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle cut", handle cut; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle decrypt", handle decrypt; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle duplicate", handle duplicate; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle enlarge", handle enlarge; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle encrypt", handle encrypt; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle extract globals", handle extract globals; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle extract routine headers", handle extract routine headers; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle extract types", handle extract types; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle extract nibble literal", handle extract nibble literal; exit.
Se the command's handler for "encontrar termo", tente encontrar; exit.
Se the command's handler for "encontrar próximo termo", encontre novamente; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle flip", handle flip; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle get size", handle get size; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle grayscale", handle grayscale usando the on flag; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle group", handle group; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle grid usando no", handle grid usando the off flag; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle grid usando yes", handle grid usando the on flag; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle indent", handle indent; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle label usando title", handle label usando "title"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle label usando page número", handle label usando "page número"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle label usando page número (even)", handle label usando "page número (even)"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle label usando page número (odd)", handle label usando "page número (odd)"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle list", handle list; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle lowercase", handle lowercase; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle minimize", handle minimize; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle mirror", handle mirror; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new directory", handle new directory; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new document", handle new document; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new ellipse", handle new shape usando "ellipse"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new page", handle new page; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new picture", handle new shape usando "picture"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new polygon", handle new shape usando "polygon"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new rectangle", handle new shape usando "rectangle"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new text", handle new shape usando "text"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle new text file", handle new text file; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle open", handle open; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle open como dump", handle open como dump; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle open como text", handle open como text; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle outdent", handle outdent; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle paste", handle paste; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle print", handle print; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle quit", handle quit; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle redo", handle redo; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle reduce", handle reduce; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle rename", handle rename; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle renumber pages", handle renumber pages; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle reverse", handle reverse; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle rotate page", handle rotate page; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle rotate shape", handle rotate shape; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle run", handle run; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle save", handle save; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle save all", handle save all; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle save como pdf", handle save como pdf; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle select all", handle select all; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle send to back", handle send to back; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle measure", handle measure; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle smooth", handle smooth; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle yank usando 1/8 inch", handle yank usando 1/8 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle yank usando 1/12 inch", handle yank usando 1/12 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle yank usando 1/16 inch", handle yank usando 1/16 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle yank usando 1/24 inch", handle yank usando 1/24 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle yank usando 1/32 inch", handle yank usando 1/32 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle yank usando 1/48 inch", handle yank usando 1/48 inch; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle yank usando the tpp", handle yank usando the tpp; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle sort definitions", handle sort definitions; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle sort selected lines", handle sort selected lines; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle sort nodettes por [via] date", handle sort nodettes usando "date"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle sort nodettes por [via] extension", handle sort nodettes usando "extension"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle sort nodettes por [via] kind", handle sort nodettes usando "kind"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle sort nodettes por [via] name", handle sort nodettes usando "name"; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle stop", handle stop; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle uncomment", handle uncomment; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle undo", handle undo; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle ungrayscale", handle grayscale usando the off flag; exit. \antes era usando no
Se the command's handler for "handle ungroup", handle ungroup; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle unlabel", handle unlabel; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle uppercase", handle uppercase; exit.
Se the command's handler for "handle version", handle version; exit.
\ not properly dispatched
Debug "Internal error 763 - command not properly dispatched".

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (*): \ special menu
Create um submenu. \ special menu
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando "handle border e fill". \ special menu
Handle the command usando the submenu e the palette width. \ special menu

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (a):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Achar uma palavra" e "F" e "encontrar termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Achar uma palavra" e "F" e "encontrar termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Achar novamente" e "N" e "encontrar próximo termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Achar novamente" e "N" e "encontrar próximo termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Abrir" e "A" e "handle open" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Abrir" e "A" e "handle open" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Abrir como dados brutos" e "handle open como dump" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Abrir como texto" e "handle open como text" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Agrupar os itens selecionados" e "G" e "handle group" to the submenu.
\\Adicione "Ajuda" e "F1" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Alinhar à Direita" e "handle align usando right" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Alinhar à Esquerda" e "handle align usando left" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Alinhar ao Centro" e "handle align usando center" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Alterar Cor da Canetinha..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Alterar Cor do Pincel..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Alterar Cor do Texto..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Alterar Fonte..." e "fonte..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Ampliar Página" e "+" e "handle enlarge" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Aumentar Zoom" e "+" e "handle enlarge" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (alignment...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Alinhar à Direita" e "handle align usando right" to the submenu.
Adicione "Alinhar à Esquerda" e "handle align usando left" to the submenu.
Adicione "Centralizar" e "handle align usando center" to the submenu.

Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (b):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Borda..." e "border..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (border...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando "handle border".
Handle the command usando the submenu e the palette width.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (c):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Cor da Canetinha..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Cor do Pincel..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Cor do Texto..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Adicione "Centralizar" e "handle align usando center" to the submenu.
Adicione "Colar" e "V" e "handle paste" to the submenu.




Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Classificar..." e "sort..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Classificar.." e "sort..." to the submenu.


Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Comentar" e "\" e "handle comment" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor",  adicione "Compilar" e "M" e "handle compile" to the submenu.
\\Adicione "Contatar Autor" e "F3" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Cor..." e "color..." to the submenu.
Adicione "Copiar" e "C" e "handle copy" to the submenu.
Adicione "Cortar" e "X" e "handle cut" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Criar arquivo lst" e "L" e "handle list" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Criptografar..." e "handle encrypt" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (check spelling...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Apenas essa página" e "handle check spelling (current page only)" to the submenu.
Adicione "O documento todo" e "handle check spelling (entire document)" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (color...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Canetinha..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Adicione "Borda..." e "border..." to the submenu.
Adicione "Preencher..." e "fill..." to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (d):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Desagrupar" e "U" e "handle ungroup" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Descriptografar..." e "handle decrypt" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Desfazer" e "Z" e "handle undo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Desfazer" e "Z" e "handle undo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Desfazer Preto e Branco" e "handle ungrayscale" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Deixar texto em LETRAS MAIÚSCULAS" e "handle uppercase" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Deixar texto em LETRAS MAIÚSCULAS" e "handle uppercase" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Deixar texto em letras minúsculas" e "handle lowercase" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Deixar texto em letras minúsculas" e "handle lowercase" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Deixar 1ª letra do texto em Maiúscula" e "handle capitalize" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Deixar 1ª letra do texto Maisúscula" e "handle capitalize" to the submenu.
Adicione "Documentação" e "F1" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Diminuir Zoom" e "R" e "handle reduce" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Duplicar" e "D" e "handle duplicate" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Duplicar" e "D" e "handle duplicate" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Duplicar" e "D" e "handle duplicate" to the submenu.

Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (e):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Embelezar texto" e "I" e "handle indent" to the submenu.
Adicione "Encerrar o programa" e "Q" e "handle quit" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Encontrar uma palavra" e "F" e "encontrar termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Encontrar uma palavra" e "F" e "encontrar termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Encontrar novamente" e "N" e "encontrar próximo termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Encontrar novamente" e "N" e "encontrar próximo termo" to the submenu.
\\Adicione "Enviar dúvidas por email" e "F3" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Enviar pra frente" e "handle bring to front" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Esconder Grade" e "handle grid usando no" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Espelhar" e "handle mirror" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Etiqueta..." e "Label..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Executar" e "R" e "handle run" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Executar" e "R" e "handle run" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Extrair Tipos" e "handle extract types" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Extrair Globais" e "handle extract globals" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Extrair Nomes de Tarefas" e "handle extract routine headers" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Extrair 4 pedacinhos literais" e "handle extract nibble literal" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Exibir Grade" e "handle grid usando yes" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (f):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Fechar este item" e "W" e "handle close" to the submenu.
Adicione "Fechar todos os itens" e "handle close all" to the submenu.
Adicione "Fechar o programa" e "Q" e "handle quit" to the submenu.
Adicione "Fonte..." e "fonte..." to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (fonte...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Cor..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Adicione "Tamanho..." e "font height..." to the submenu.
Adicione "Tipo..." e "handle font name" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (fill...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando "handle fill".
Handle the command usando the submenu e the palette width.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (font height...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Gigante" e "handle font height usando 1 inch" to the submenu.
Adicione "Maior" e "handle font height usando 1/2 inch" to the submenu.
Adicione "Grande" e "handle font height usando 1/3 inch" to the submenu.
Adicione "Normal" e "handle font height usando 1/4 inch" to the submenu.
Adicione "Pequena" e "handle font height usando 1/5 inch" to the submenu.
Adicione "Menor" e "handle font height usando 1/6 inch" to the submenu.
Adicione "Minúsculo" e "handle font height usando 1/8 inch" to the submenu.
Adicione "Outro tamanho y/x..." e "handle font height other" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (g):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Girar Página" e "handle rotate page" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Girar Forma" e "J" e "handle rotate shape" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Grade..." e "grid..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Gravar alterações" e "S" e "handle save" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Gravar alterações" e "S" e "handle save" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Gravar alteraçõesr" e "S" e "handle save" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (grid...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Esconder" e "handle grid usando no" to the submenu.
Adicione "Mostrar" e "handle grid usando yes" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (h):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (i):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Imprimir..." e "P" e "handle print" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Imprimir..." e "P" e "handle print" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Imprimir..." e "P" e "handle print" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (j):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (k):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (l):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Localizar um texto" e "F" e "encontrar termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Localizar um texto" e "F" e "encontrar termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Localizar novamente" e "N" e "encontrar próximo termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Localizar novamente" e "N" e "encontrar próximo termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (label...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Número da Página"  e "handle label usando page número" to the submenu.
Adicione "Número da Página (Par)"  e "handle label usando page número (even)" to the submenu.
Adicione "Número da Página (Ímpar)"  e "handle label usando page número (odd)" to the submenu.
Adicione "Título"  e "handle label usando title" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (m):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Mandar email p/ tirar dúvidas" e "F3" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Mandar pra frente" e "handle bring to front" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Mandar pra trás" e "handle send to back" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Medir..." e "handle measure" to the submenu.
Adicione "Minimizar" e "handle minimize" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Mostar Grade" e "handle grid usando yes" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Mudar Cor da Canetinha..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Mudar Cor do Pincel..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Mudar Cor do Texto..." e "pen..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Mudar o Tamanho da Letra..." e "font height..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Mudar o Tipo da Letra..." e "handle font name" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Mudar o Tamanho da Letra..." e "font height..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Mudar o Tipo da Letra..." e "handle font name" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (n):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nova Pasta..." e "handle new directory" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Novo Documento..." e "handle new document" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nova Elipse" e "handle new ellipse" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nova Página" e "handle new page" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nova Figura..." e "handle new picture" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Novo Polígono" e "handle new polygon" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Novo Retângulo" e "handle new rectangle" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Novo Texto" e "handle new text" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Novo Arquivo de Texto..." e "handle new text file" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui" e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (o):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Obter Tamanho" e "handle get size" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Ocultar Grade" e "handle grid usando no" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Ordenar/Organizar..." e "sort..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Ordenar/Organizar..." e "sort..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (p):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Parar" e "handle stop" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Parar" e "handle stop" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Preencher..." e "fill..." to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Preto e Branco" e "handle grayscale" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Procurar" e "F" e "encontrar termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Procurar" e "F" e "encontrar termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Procurar de Novo" e "N" e "encontrar próximo termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Procurar de Novo" e "N" e "encontrar próximo termo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (pen...):
Create um submenu.
Adicione swatches to the submenu usando "handle pen".
Handle the command usando the submenu e the palette width.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (q):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Quero sair do programa" e "Q" e "handle quit" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (r):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Raio..." e "handle radius" to the submenu.
Adicione "Recortar" e "X" e "handle cut" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Refazer" e "Y" e "handle redo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Refazer" e "Y" e "handle redo" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Reduzir Zoom" e "R" e "handle reduce" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Remover Comentário(s)" e "U" e "handle uncomment" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Remover Espaços Extras" e "O" e "handle outdent" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Remover Etiqueta" e "handle unlabel" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Renomear..." e "F2" e "handle rename" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Renumerar Páginas..." e "handle renumber pages" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Reverter" e "handle reverse" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Reverter" e "handle reverse" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (s):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Sair do programa" e "Q" e "handle quit" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Salvar" e "S" e "handle save" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Salvar" e "S" e "handle save" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Salvar" e "S" e "handle save" to the submenu.
Adicione "Salvar Tudo" e "handle save all" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Salvar como PDF..." e "handle save como pdf" to the submenu.
Adicione "Selecionar Tudo" e "T" e "handle select all" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Suavizar" e "M" e "handle smooth" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (sort...):
Create um submenu.
\Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Todas como definições"  e "handle sort definitions" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Somente como linhas selecionadas"  e "handle sort selected lines" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Por tipo"  e "handle sort nodettes por [via] kind" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Por Nome"  e "handle sort nodettes por [via] name" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Por extensão"  e "handle sort nodettes por [via] extension" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (t):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Trazer pra frente" e "handle bring to front" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (u):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (v):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Verificar Ortografia" e "handle check spelling" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Verificar Ortografia..." e "check spelling..." to the submenu.
Adicione "Versão"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Virar" e "handle flip" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (w):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (x):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (y):
Create um submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Yank 1/8"  e "handle yank usando 1/8 inch" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Yank 1/12"  e "handle yank usando 1/12 inch" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Yank 1/16"  e "handle yank usando 1/16 inch" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Yank 1/24"  e "handle yank usando 1/24 inch" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Yank 1/32"  e "handle yank usando 1/32 inch" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Yank 1/48"  e "handle yank usando 1/48 inch" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", adicione "Yank None"  e "handle yank usando the tpp" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", adicione "Nada por aqui"  e "handle version" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command (z):
Create um submenu.
Adicione "Zarpar daqui" e "Q" e "handle quit" to the submenu.
Handle the command usando the submenu.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command usando um submenu: handle the command usando the submenu e the submenu width.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um command usando um submenu e um width:
Put the command's left e the bar's display's bottom into um spot.
Adjust the submenu usando the spot e the width.
Flush all events.
Void the selected command.
Put the submenu into the current menu.
Show the desktop.
Handle events usando the submenu.
Void the current menu.
Handle the selected command.
Destroy the submenu.
Show the desktop.
Refresh the cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle comment:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle comment usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle compile:
Se the current tab's mode for not "editor", cluck; exit.
Handle save all.
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, cancele.
Find um directory to compile.
Se the directory estiver blank, show error "Não tem nada por aqui."; exit.
Compile the directory.
Se the compiler's abort flag estiver verde, handle compile or list or run error; exit.
Show status the compiler's timer's string then " milissegundos".

Etapas necessárias para que se handle compile or list or run error:
Se the compiler's abort path estiver blank, show error the compiler's abort message; exit.
Loop.
Get um tab from the tabs.
Se the tab for inexistente, show error the compiler's abort message; exit.
Se the compiler's abort path for not the tab's node's path, repeat.
Se the tab's node's source for inexistente, show error the compiler's abort message; exit.
Select the compiler's abort row# usando the tab's node's source's text.
Scroll the tab's node's source's text to the caret e center it.
Switch to the tab.
Show the desktop.
Show error the compiler's abort message.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle copy:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle copy usando the current tab's node; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle copy usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle copy usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle copy usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle cut:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle cut usando the current tab's node; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle cut usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle cut usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle cut usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle decrypt:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle decrypt usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle the dialog:
Se the dialog for inexistente, cancele.
Flush all events.
Adjust the dialog.
Switch the bar to "dialog".
Handle events usando the dialog.
Switch the bar to "normal" sem drawing.
Se the answer estiver blank, show the desktop.
Se the dialog's text for inexistente, show the desktop.
Flush all events.
Refresh the cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle duplicate:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle duplicate usando the current tab's node; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle duplicate usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle duplicate usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle encrypt:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle encrypt usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle enlarge:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle enlarge usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event:
Se the event for inexistente, cancele.
Se the event's kind for "key down", handle the event (key down); exit.
Se the event's kind for "left click", handle the event (left click); exit.
Se the event's kind for "left double click", handle the event (left double click); exit.
Se the event's kind for "refresh", handle the event (refresh); exit.
Se the event's kind for "right click", handle the event (right click); exit.
Se the event's kind for "set cursor", handle the event (set cursor); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (key down - ctrl-tab):
Se the event's shift flag estiver verde, switch to the predecessor of the current tab.
Se the event's shift flag estiver not verde, switch to the successor of the current tab.
Show the desktop with status.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (key down - shortcut):
Se the event's key é the a-key, handle comment; exit.
Se the event's key é the b-key, handle select all; exit.
Se the event's key é the c-key, handle copy; exit.
Se the event's key é the d-key, handle duplicate; exit.
Se the event's key é the e-key, handle enlarge; exit.
Se the event's key é the f-key, tente encontrar; exit.
Se the event's key é the g-key, handle group; exit.
Se the event's key é the i-key, handle indent; exit.
Se the event's key é the j-key, handle rotate shape; exit.
Se the event's key é the l-key, handle list; exit.
Se the event's key é the m-key e the current tab's mode for "editor", handle compile; exit.
Se the event's key é the m-key e the current tab's mode for "writer", handle smooth; exit.
Se the event's key é the n-key, encontre novamente; exit.
Se the event's key é the o-key e the current tab's mode for "editor", handle outdent; exit.
Se the event's key é the o-key, handle open; exit.
Se the event's key é the p-key, handle print; exit.
Se the event's key é the q-key, handle quit; exit.
Se the event's key é the r-key e the current tab's mode for "editor", handle run; exit.
Se the event's key é the r-key e the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle run; exit.
Se the event's key é the r-key e the current tab's mode for "writer", handle reduce; exit.
Se the event's key é the s-key, handle save; exit.
Se the event's key é the t-key, handle select all; exit.
Se the event's key é the u-key e the current tab's mode for "editor", handle uncomment; exit.
Se the event's key é the u-key e the current tab's mode for "writer", handle ungroup; exit.
Se the event's key é the v-key, handle paste; exit.
Se the event's key é the w-key, handle close; exit.
Se the event's key é the x-key, handle cut; exit.
Se the event's key é the y-key, handle redo; exit.
Se the event's key é the z-key, handle undo; exit.
Se the event's key é the F1-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F2-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F3-key, encontre novamente; exit.
Se the event's key é the F4-key, handle quit; exit.
Se the event's key é the F5-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F6-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F7-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F8-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F9-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F10-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F11-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F12-key, handle version; exit.
Se the event's key é the F12-key, handle version; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (key down):
Se the event é any shortcut, handle the event (key down - shortcut); exit.
Se the event é ctrl-tab, handle the event (key down - ctrl-tab); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle the event usando the current tab's node (key down); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle the event usando the current tab's node's source (key down); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle the event usando the current tab's node's document (key down); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle the event usando the current tab's node's page (key down); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (left click - menu):
Find um command usando the menu e the event's spot.
Handle the command.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (left click - status):
Track the desktop usando the event.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (left click - switch):
Find um tab usando the event's spot.
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Se the tab é the current tab, abra um flag.
Switch to the tab.
Show the desktop with status.
Track the tab returning another flag.
Se the other flag estiver verde, cancele.
Se the flag estiver not verde, cancele.
Handle close.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (left click):
Se the event's spot estiver in the menu, handle the event (left click - menu); exit.
Se the event's spot estiver in the status, handle the event (left click - status); exit.
Se the event's spot estiver in the switch, handle the event (left click - switch); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle the event usando the current tab's node (left click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle the event usando the current tab's node's source (left click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle the event usando the current tab's node's document (left click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle the event usando the current tab's node's page (left click); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (left double click):
Se the event's spot estiver in the bar, cancele.
Se the event's spot estiver in the switch, cancele.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle the event usando the current tab's node (left double click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle the event usando the current tab's node's source (left double click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle the event usando the current tab's node's document (left double click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle the event usando the current tab's node's page (left double click); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (refresh):
Show the desktop with status.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (right click):
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle the event usando the current tab's node (right click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle the event usando the current tab's node's source (right click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle the event usando the current tab's node's document (right click); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle the event usando the current tab's node's page (right click); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event (set cursor):
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle the event usando the current tab's node (set cursor); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle the event usando the current tab's node's source (set cursor); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle the event usando the current tab's node's document (set cursor); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle the event usando the current tab's node's page (set cursor); exit.
Show the arrow cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog:
Se the event's kind for "key down", handle the event usando the dialog (key down); exit.
Se the event's kind for "left click", handle the event usando the dialog (left click); exit.
Se the event's kind for "left double click", handle the event usando the dialog (left double click); exit.
Se the event's kind for "refresh", handle the event usando the dialog (refresh); exit.
Se the event's kind for "right click", handle the event usando the dialog (right click); exit.
Se the event's kind for "set cursor", handle the event usando the dialog (set cursor); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (copy):
Se nothing é selected in the dialog's text, cluck; exit.
Handle copy usando the dialog's text.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (cut):
Se nothing é selected in the dialog's text, cluck; exit.
Handle cut usando the dialog's text.
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - backspace key):
Handle the event usando the dialog's text (backspace key).
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - choice):
Se the event's key é the enter key, put "yes" into the answer; relinquish control; exit.
Se the event's key é the escape key, put "cancel" into the answer; relinquish control; exit.
Find um button usando the event's key.
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Put the button's name into the answer.
Relinquish control.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - delete key):
Handle the event usando the dialog's text (delete key).
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - end key):
Handle the event usando the dialog's text (end key).
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - enter key):
Extract the answer from the dialog's text.
Relinquish control.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - error):
Cancel the dialog.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - escape key):
Cancel the dialog.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - home key):
Handle the event usando the dialog's text (home key).
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - input):
Se the event é any shortcut, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - shortcut); exit.
Se the event's pedaço é printable, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - printable key); exit.
Se the event's key é the backspace key, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - backspace key); exit.
Se the event's key é the delete key, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - delete key); exit.
Se the event's key é the end key, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - end key); exit.
Se the event's key é the enter key, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - enter key); exit.
Se the event's key é the escape key, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - escape key); exit.
Se the event's key é the home key, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - home key); exit.
Se the event's key é the left-arrow key, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - left-arrow key); exit.
Se the event's key é the right-arrow key, handle the event usando the dialog (key down - right-arrow key); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - left-arrow key):
Handle the event usando the dialog's text (left-arrow key).
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - printable key):
Handle the event usando the dialog's text (printable key).
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - right-arrow key):
Handle the event usando the dialog's text (right-arrow key).
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down - shortcut):
Se the event's key é the a-key, handle the event usando the dialog (select all).
Se the event's key é the c-key, handle the event usando the dialog (copy).
Se the event's key é the v-key, handle the event usando the dialog (paste).
Se the event's key é the x-key, handle the event usando the dialog (cut).
Se the event's key é the y-key, handle the event usando the dialog (redo).
Se the event's key é the z-key, handle the event usando the dialog (undo).

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (key down):
Se the dialog's kind for "choice", handle the event usando the dialog (key down - choice); exit.
Se the dialog's kind for "error", handle the event usando the dialog (key down - error); exit.
Se the dialog's kind for "input", handle the event usando the dialog (key down - input); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (left click - choice):
Se the event's spot for not in the bar, cancel the dialog; exit.
Find um button usando the event's spot.
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Put the button's name into the answer.
Relinquish control.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (left click - error):
Se the event's spot for not in the bar, cancel the dialog; exit.
Find um button usando the event's spot.
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Put the button's name into the answer.
Relinquish control.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (left click - input):
Se the event's spot for not in the bar, cancel the dialog; exit.
Se the event's spot estiver in the dialog's text, track the dialog usando the event; exit.
Find um button usando the event's spot.
Se the button for inexistente, cancele.
Se the button's name for "cancel", cancel the dialog; exit.
Extract the answer from the dialog's text.
Relinquish control.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (left click):
Se the dialog's kind for "choice", handle the event usando the dialog (left click - choice); exit.
Se the dialog's kind for "error", handle the event usando the dialog (left click - error); exit.
Se the dialog's kind for "input", handle the event usando the dialog (left click - input); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (left double click):
Se the dialog's text for inexistente, cancele.
Handle the event usando the dialog's text (left double click).
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (paste):
Se there for not text on the windows clipboard, cluck; exit.
Handle paste usando the dialog's text.
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (redo):
Se the dialog's text cannot be redone, cluck; exit.
Handle redo usando the dialog's text.
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (refresh):
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (right click):
Se the event's spot estiver in the bar, cancele.
Cancel the dialog.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (select all):
Handle select all usando the dialog's text.
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (set cursor):
Se the event's spot estiver in the dialog's text, show the i-beam cursor; exit.
Show the arrow cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando the dialog (undo):
Se the dialog's text cannot be undone, cluck; exit.
Handle undo usando the dialog's text.
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando um submenu:
Se the event's kind for "key down", handle the event usando the submenu (key down); exit.
Se the event's kind for "left click", handle the event usando the submenu (left click); exit.
Se the event's kind for "refresh", handle the event usando the submenu (refresh); exit.
Se the event's kind for "set cursor", handle the event usando the submenu (set cursor); exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando um submenu (key down):
Se the event's key é the escape key, relinquish control.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando um submenu (left click - menu):
Find um command usando the submenu e the event's spot.
Se the command for inexistente, cancele.
Put the command into the selected command.
Relinquish control.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando um submenu (left click):
Se the event's spot estiver in the submenu, handle the event usando the submenu (left click - menu); exit.
Relinquish control.
Se the event's spot estiver in the menu, reque the event.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando um submenu (refresh):
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle um event usando um submenu (set cursor):
Show the arrow cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle events:
Deque um event.
Se the event for inexistente, cancele.
Handle the event.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle events usando the dialog:
Deque um event.
Se the event for inexistente, cancele.
Handle the event usando the dialog.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle events usando um submenu:
Deque um event.
Se the event for inexistente, cancele.
Handle the event usando the submenu.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle extract globals:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle extract globals usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle extract nibble literal:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle extract nibble literal usando the current tab's node; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle extract routine headers:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle extract routine headers usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle extract types:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle extract types usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle fill usando um color:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle fill usando the current tab's node's page e the color; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se tente encontrar:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", tente encontrar usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", tente encontrar usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se encontre novamente:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", encontre novamente usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", encontre novamente usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle flip:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle flip usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle font height usando um font height:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle font height usando the current tab's node's source e the font height; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle font height usando the current tab's node's page e the font height; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle font height other:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle font height other usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle font height other usando the current tab's node's page; exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle font name:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle font name usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle font name usando the current tab's node's page; exit.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle get size:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle get size usando the current tab's node; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle grayscale usando um flag:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle grayscale usando the current tab's node's page e the flag; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle grid usando um flag:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle grid usando the current tab's node's page e the flag; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle group:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle group usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle indent:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle indent usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle label usando um label:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle label usando the current tab's node's page e the label; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle list:
Se the current tab's mode for not "editor", cluck; exit.
Handle save all.
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, cancele.
Find um directory to compile.
Se the directory estiver blank, show error "Não tem nada para eu compilar e listar"; exit.
Compile the directory.
Show status "Listando...".
List.
Se the compiler's abort flag estiver verde, handle compile or list or run error; exit.
Show status the compiler's timer's string then " milissegundos".

Etapas necessárias para que se handle lowercase:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle lowercase usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle lowercase usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle measure:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle measure usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle minimize:
Minimize the main window.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle mirror:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle mirror usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle new directory:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle new directory usando the current tab's node; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle new document:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle new document usando the current tab's node; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle new page:
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle new page usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle new shape usando um kind:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle new shape usando the current tab's node's page e the kind; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle new text file:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle new text file usando the current tab's node; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle open:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle open (localizador); exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle open (docster); exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle open (docster):
Handle open sem drawing (docster).
Show the desktop with status.
Flush the event queue.
Refresh the cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle open (localizador):
Se the current tab's mode for not "localizador", cluck; exit.
Get some selected path links usando the current tab's node.
Se the selected path links are empty, show error "Não tem nada aqui pra eu abrir."; exit.
Show status "Abrindo...".
Put the current tab into um tab.
Loop.
Get um path link from the selected path links.
Se the path link for inexistente, pare.
Collapse the tab's node to root-level.
Open the tab's node usando the path link's string.
Switch the tab to the tab's node.
Switch to the tab.
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, show error the i/o error; break.
Se the tab's node should be read-only, abra the tab's node to read-only mode.
Find um free tab starting with the tab's next.
Se the free tab for inexistente, pare.
Put the free tab into the tab.
Repeat.
Destroy the selected path links.
Show the desktop with status.
Flush the event queue.
Refresh the cursor.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle open como dump:
Se the current tab's mode for not "localizador", cluck; exit.
Put the current tab's node's first selected nodette into um nodette.
Se the nodette for inexistente, show error "Não tem nada pra abrir aqui."; exit.
Se the nodette's kind for not "file", cluck; exit.
Show status "Abrindo...".
Open the nodette (file como dump).
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, show error the i/o error; exit.
Switch the current tab to the nodette.
Show the desktop with status.
Flush the event queue.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle open como text:
Se the current tab's mode for not "localizador", cluck; exit.
Put the current tab's node's first selected nodette into um nodette.
Se the nodette for inexistente, show error "Não tem nada pra eu abrir."; exit.
Se the nodette's kind for not "file", cluck; exit.
Show status "Abrindo...".
Open the nodette (file como text).
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, show error the i/o error; exit.
Switch the current tab to the nodette.
Show the desktop with status.
Flush the event queue.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle open sem drawing (docster):
Put the current tab's node's document's first selected page into um page.
Se the page for inexistente, show error "Não tem nada pra eu abrir."; exit.
Focus on the page in the current tab's node's document.
Put the page into the current tab's node's page.
Open the current tab's node's page.
Switch the current tab to the current tab's node.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle outdent:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle outdent usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle paste:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle paste usando the current tab's node; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle paste usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle paste usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle paste usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle pen usando um color:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle pen usando the current tab's node's page e the color; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle print:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle print usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle print usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle print usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle quit:
Se the user for not sure, cancele.
Loop.
Show status "Saindo...".
Get um tab from the tabs.
Se the tab for inexistente, relinquish control; exit.
Se the tab's node for not modified, repeat.
Switch to the tab.
Show the desktop.
Se the user for not willing to close the tab's node, cancele.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle radius:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle radius usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle redo:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle redo usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle redo usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle reduce:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle reduce usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle rename:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle rename usando the current tab's node; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle renumber pages:
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle renumber pages usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle reverse:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle reverse usando the current tab's node; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle reverse usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle rotate page:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle rotate page usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle rotate shape:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle rotate shape usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle run:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle run usando the current tab's node; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for not "editor", cluck; exit.
Handle save all.
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, cancele.
Find um directory to compile.
Se the directory estiver blank, show error "Não tem nada pra eu fazer aqui."; exit.
Compile the directory.
Se the compiler's abort flag estiver verde, handle compile or list or run error; exit.
Show status "Executando...".
Start the current process usando the compiler's exe path.
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, show error the i/o error; exit.
Show status the compiler's timer's string then " milissegundos".

Etapas necessárias para que se handle save:
Se the current tab's node for not savable, cluck; show status "Não tem como salvar isso aqui"; exit.
Show status "Salvando...".
Save the current tab's node.
Se the i/o error estiver not blank, show error the i/o error; exit.
Show status "Salvo".

Etapas necessárias para que se handle save all:
Show status "Salvando...".
Put 0 into um count.
Clear the i/o error.
Loop.
Get um tab from the tabs.
Se the tab for inexistente, show status the count e "arquivo salvo" or "arquivos salvos"; exit. \ <-------------
Se the tab's node for not savable, repeat.
Save the tab's node.
Se the i/o error estiver blank, adicione 1 to the count; repeat.
Switch to the tab.
Show the desktop.
Show error the i/o error.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle save como pdf:
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle save como pdf usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle select all:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle select all usando the current tab's node; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle select all usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", handle select all usando the current tab's node's document; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle select all usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle send to back:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle send to back usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle smooth:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle smooth usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle sort definitions:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle sort definitions usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle sort nodettes usando um string:
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", handle sort nodettes usando the current tab's node e the string; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle sort selected lines:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle sort selected lines usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle stop:
Se the current process for 0, cluck; exit.
Show status "Parando...".
Stop the current process.
Show status "Parei".

Etapas necessárias para que se handle uncomment:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle uncomment usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle undo:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle undo usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle undo usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle ungroup:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle ungroup usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle unlabel:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle unlabel usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle uppercase:
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", handle uppercase usando the current tab's node's source; exit.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle uppercase usando the current tab's node's page; exit.
Cluck.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle version:
Show status the module's name.

Etapas necessárias para que se handle yank usando um número:
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", handle yank usando the current tab's node's page e the número; exit.
Cluck.

An handler é um string.

Etapas necessárias para que se initialize:
Initialize the desktop.
Initialize the localizador.
Initialize the editor.
Initialize the writer.
Initialize the compiler.
Fill the tabs.
Switch to the tabs' first.

Etapas necessárias para que se initialize the bar:
Put "normal" into the bar's mode.
Put 1/4 inch plus 1/3 inch plus 1/4 inch into the bar's height.
Put the screen's left into the bar's left.
Put the screen's top into the bar's top.
Put the screen's right into the bar's right.
Put the screen's top plus the bar's height into the bar's bottom.
Put the bar's box into the bar's display.
Adjust the bar's display usando 1/4 inch e 1/4 inch e -1/4 inch e -1/4 inch.
Destroy the menu.
Create the menu.
Initialize the status.

Etapas necessárias para que se initialize the desktop:
Put the lightest gray color into the desktop color. \Put 400 into the desktop color's saturation.
Put the light sky color into the comment color. \\ Aqui você muda um cor dos comentários
Put the lightest sky color into the grid color.
Put the red color into the tracer color. \ tracer
Initialize the bar.
Initialize the switch.
Initialize the pad. \ uses the bar e the switch

Etapas necessárias para que se initialize the pad:
Put the screen's left into the pad's left.
Put the bar's bottom into the pad's top.
Put the screen's right into the pad's right.
Put the switch's top into the pad's bottom.

Etapas necessárias para que se initialize the status:
Put the bar's display e 1/12 inch into the status' roundy box.
Put the menu's commands' last's right into the status' left.

Etapas necessárias para que se initialize the switch:
Initialize the tabs.
Put 1/4 inch plus 1/3 inch into the switch's height.
Put the screen's left into the switch's left.
Put the screen's bottom minus the switch's height into the switch's top.
Put the screen's right into the switch's right.
Put the screen's bottom into the switch's bottom.
Adjust the tabs.

Etapas necessárias para que se initialize some tabs:
Adicione 1 to um count.
Se the count é greater than 10, pare.
Create um tab.
Append the tab to the tabs.
Repeat.

The menu é um menu.

An menu é um coisa with some commands.

An mode é um string.

The pad has um box.

The palette width é um width equal to 2-1/3 inches.

An prompt é um string.

An question é um string.

Etapas necessárias para que se execute nosso programa;
Etapas necessárias para que se run:
Start up.
Initialize.
Handle events.
Finalize.
Shut down.

The selected command é um command.

An shortcut é um string.

Etapas necessárias para que se show the desktop:
Draw the desktop.
Refresh the screen.

Etapas necessárias para que se show the desktop with status:
Clear the status' string.
Se the current tab's mode for "localizador", get the status por the current tab's node.
Se the current tab's mode for "editor", get the status por the current tab's node's source.
Se the current tab's mode for "docster", get the status por the current tab's node's document.
Se the current tab's mode for "writer", get the status por the current tab's node's page.
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se show the desktop with um string:
Put the string into the status' string.
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se show error um string:
Create the dialog.
Put "error" into the dialog's kind.
Put the red color into the dialog's pen.
Put the string into the dialog's prompt.
Adicione um button to the dialog usando "Beleza".
Cluck.
Handle the dialog.
Destroy the dialog.

Etapas necessárias para que se show the status:
Draw the status.
Refresh the screen usando the status' roundy box.

Etapas necessárias para que se show status um número e um string or another string:
Format the número e the string or the other string into um third string.
Show status the third string.

Etapas necessárias para que se show status um string:
Put the string into the status' string.
Show the status.

The status has um roundy box e um string.

An submenu é um menu.

The submenu width é um width equal to 3 inches. \\ Aqui você muda um largura do submenu.  

The swatch width é um width equal to 1/3 inch.

Etapas necessárias para que se switch the bar to um mode:
Put the mode into the bar's mode.
Clear the status' string.
Show the desktop.

Etapas necessárias para que se switch the bar to um mode sem drawing:
Put the mode into the bar's mode.
Clear the status' string.

The switch has um height e um box.

Etapas necessárias para que se switch to the predecessor of um tab:
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Put the tab's previous into another tab.
Se the other tab for inexistente, put the tabs' last into the other tab.
Switch to the other tab.

Etapas necessárias para que se switch to the successor of um tab:
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Put the tab's next into another tab.
Se the other tab for inexistente, put the tabs' first into the other tab.
Switch to the other tab.

Etapas necessárias para que se switch to um tab:
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Se the tab é the current tab, cancele.
Put the tab into the current tab.

Etapas necessárias para que se switch um tab to um node:
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Se the node for inexistente, cancele.
Put the node into the tab's node.
Put the node's designator into the tab's name.
Lowercase the tab's name.
Format the tab's name to fit in the tab's box usando the default font.
Put "localizador" into the tab's mode.
Se the node's source for not inexistente, put "editor" into the tab's mode.
Se the node's document for not inexistente, put "docster" into the tab's mode.
Se the node's page for not inexistente, put "writer" into the tab's mode.

An tab é um coisa with
an box,
an name,
an mode,
an node.

The tabs are some tabs.

Etapas necessárias para que se track the desktop usando um event:
Se the event for inexistente, cancele.
Loop.
Se the mouse's left button é up, pare.
Put the mouse's spot into um spot.
\Se the spot's x é greater than the screen's right, move the main window right; repeat.
\Se the spot's x é less than the screen's left, move the main window left; repeat.
Se the spot's x-coord é greater than the screen's right, move the main window right; repeat.
Se the spot's x-coord é less than the screen's left, move the main window left; repeat.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se track the dialog usando um event:
Se the dialog for inexistente, cancele.
Se the dialog's text for inexistente, cancele.
Se the event for inexistente, cancele.
Extend any selection in the dialog's text usando the event's spot.
Se the event's shift flag estiver not verde, deselect the dialog's text.
Clear um selection.
Loop.
Se um flag estiver verde, show the desktop with status.
Se the mouse's left button é up, cancele.
Put the mouse's spot into um spot.
Autoscroll the dialog's text usando the spot e the flag.
Extend any selection in the dialog's text usando the spot.
Se the dialog's text's selection é the selection, repeat.
Abra the flag.
Put the dialog's text's selection into the selection.
Repeat.

Etapas necessárias para que se track um tab returning um flag:
Feche the flag.
Se the tab for inexistente, cancele.
Loop.
Se the mouse's left button é up, cancele.
Put the mouse's spot into um spot.
Find another tab usando the spot.
Se the other tab for inexistente, repeat.
Se the tab é the other tab, repeat.
Abra the flag.
Remove the tab from the tabs.
Se the other tab's left é less than the tab's left, insert the tab into the tabs before the other tab.
Se the other tab's left é greater than the tab's left, insert the tab into the tabs after the other tab.
Adjust the tabs.
Show the desktop.
Repeat.
